Hawaii statutes.
§46-1.55 Indigenous Hawaiian architecture.
(a) Each county shall adopt ordinances allowing the exercise of indigenous
native Hawaiian architectural practices, styles, customs, techniques, and
materials historically employed by native Hawaiians, in the county's building
code, including but not limited to residential and other structures comprised
of either rock wall or wood frame walls covered by thatches of different native
grasses or other natural material for roofs.

(b) The application of indigenous Hawaiian
architecture shall be permitted in all zoning districts; provided it is
consistent with the intent and purpose of the uniquely designated, special, or
historic district.

(c) Each county shall adopt or amend its
ordinances to implement this section no later than March 31, 2008. The
ordinance adopted by Maui county shall serve as a model. [L 2006, c 310, §2; am
L 2007, c 222, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next